California, session 20252026, AB1531.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 8654.4 of the Government Code is amended to read:8654.4. (a) The Office of Emergency Services shall enter into a joint powers agreement, in accordance with the Joint Exercise of Powers Act (Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 6500) of Division 7 of Title 1) and this article, with the Department of Forestry and Fire Protection to develop and administer a comprehensive wildfire mitigation program to do both of the following:(1) Encourage cost-effective structure hardening and retrofitting that creates fire-resistant homes, businesses, and public buildings.(2) Facilitate vegetation management, the creation and maintenance of defensible space, and other fuel modification activities that provide neighborhood or communitywide benefits against wildfire.(b) The Department of Forestry and Fire Protection shall delegate its duties and responsibilities for this program to the Office of the State Fire Marshal.(c) On or before July 1, 2026, the Department of Insurance shall be added as an ex officio nonvoting member to the California Wildfire Mitigation Program Board created pursuant to the joint powers agreement described in subdivision (a).